California, session 20252026, AB984.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 17072 of the Revenue and Taxation Code is amended to read:17072. (a) Section 62 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to adjusted gross income defined, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.(b) Section 62(a)(2)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certain expenses of elementary and secondary school teachers, shall not apply.(c) Section 62(a)(21) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to attorneys fees relating to awards to whistleblowers, shall not apply.(d) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2031, Section 62(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to general rule, is modified to provide that the deduction under Section 17208 shall be allowed in determining adjusted gross income.SEC. 2. Section 17208 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:17208. (a) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2031, there shall be allowed as a deduction an amount equal to the amount contributed during the taxable year by a taxpayer to a CalABLE account established pursuant to Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 4875) of Division 4.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(b) For purposes of Section 41, the Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) The objective of this section is to increase the amount contributed to CalABLE accounts and to help people with disabilities and their families prepare for the future.(2) The Franchise Tax Board shall submit a report, on or before January 1, 2031, to the Legislature that shall include, but is not limited to, the amount of deductions allowed to CalABLE contributors pursuant to this section, and findings and declarations relating to the goals of the deduction. The report shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(3) The success of this section shall be measured by calculating the average of the contributions made during for the taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2027, and each subsequent taxable year, to determine if there is an increase in contributions per year.(c) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 3. This act provides for a tax levy within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect.